Utah statutes.
58-9-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

(1)  "Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(a)  the failure of a funeral service director to accurately document, report, and supervise the activities of a funeral service intern;

(b)  knowingly soliciting the sale of any funeral service or funeral merchandise for a person whose death occurred or was imminent prior to the solicitation;

(c)  paying or offering to pay a commission or anything of value to secure deceased human remains for a funeral service or disposition to:

(i)  medical personnel;

(ii)  a nursing home;

(iii)  a nursing home employee;

(iv)  a hospice;

(v)  a hospice employee;

(vi)  clergy;

(vii)  a government official; or

(viii)  any other third party; and

(d)  failure to provide the following current information to the division:

(i)  a licensee's business address;

(ii)  a licensee's primary residence;

(iii)  a funeral service establishment's funeral service director; or

(iv)  a supervising funeral service director's funeral service intern's name.

(2)  "Unprofessional conduct" does not include:

(a)  general advertising directed to the public at large; or

(b)  responding to a notification of death from:

(i)  medical personnel;

(ii)  a nursing home;

(iii)  a nursing home employee;

(iv)  a hospice;

(v)  a hospice employee;

(vi)  clergy;

(vii)  a government official; or

(viii)  any authorized representative of the family of the deceased person.



Amended by Chapter 144, 2007 General Session

